Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3021.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [145.904] GRANT PROGRAM; YOUTH SPORTS PHYSICALS BY MOBILE CLINICS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of health. new text end new text begin (c) "Mobile health evaluation and screening clinic" or "mobile clinic" means a clinic transported in a vehicle-mounted unit that is either motorized or trailered and readily movable with disassembling, and in which one or more health professionals are transported to provide evaluation and screening services in more than one geographic location. new text end new text begin (d) "School" has the meaning given in section 120A.22, subdivision 4, but does not include a home school. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Grant program established. new text end new text begin The commissioner must establish and administer a grant program to provide youth sports physicals at schools in Minnesota by mobile health evaluation and screening clinics. To be eligible for a grant under this section, an entity must demonstrate that the entity has matching funds from nonstate sources equal to at least 25 percent of the grant amount sought. An entity seeking a grant must apply to the commissioner in a form and manner specified by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Scheduling of visits; staffing. new text end new text begin An entity receiving a grant under this section must engage in outreach with schools in Minnesota and schedule mobile clinic visits with interested schools to provide youth sports physicals to students enrolled in the school. Before a mobile clinic's visit to a school, the entity receiving the grant must provide the school with information to make available to families on the importance of preventive health care for students participating in youth sports. A mobile clinic must be staffed with at least one physician licensed under chapter 147, physician assistant licensed under chapter 147A, or advanced practice registered nurse as defined in section 148.171, subdivision 3, and may also be staffed with other health professionals. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Required elements of a youth sports physical; referrals. new text end new text begin (a) A youth sports physical provided by health professionals at a mobile clinic under this section must at least include a cardiac screening, respiratory assessment, blood pressure evaluation, musculoskeletal examination, family medical history review, and mental health screening. The mental health screening must at least include a stress and anxiety evaluation, a depression and emotional well-being assessment, an evaluation of sleep and fatigue, a substance use disorder screening, an eating disorder screening, and a provision of resources and referrals if needed. new text end new text begin (b) A health professional who conducts youth sports physicals under this section must refer or advise a student to seek additional evaluation or services if indicated based on the screenings and assessments conducted. A health professional who identifies concerns regarding a student's mental health must refer the student for confidential follow-up with the student's school counselor or mental health professional, or advise a student to see a local mental health professional. new text end new text begin (c) An entity receiving a grant must establish a policy regarding parental consent to youth sports physicals that complies with applicable federal and state laws. Health professionals conducting youth sports physicals at the entity's mobile clinic must comply with the entity's policy. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Uninsured students. new text end new text begin A mobile clinic providing youth sports physicals under this section must provide youth sports physicals free of charge to students who are uninsured. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Data collection and reporting. new text end new text begin A mobile clinic must maintain and share with the commissioner, in a form and manner specified by the commissioner, data on numbers of youth sports physicals provided, schools in which youth sports physicals are provided, numbers of referrals made for follow-up services and the reasons for referrals, and other data specified by the commissioner. The commissioner must use the reported data to identify trends and improve the services delivered by mobile clinics. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $600,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for the grant program for youth sports physicals by mobile clinics under Minnesota Statutes, section 145.904. new text end